Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.150

Additional assessments for special projects.

The producers of any specific tree fruit subject to the provisions of this chapter may at any time by referendum conducted by the department and approved by a majority of the producers voting of such specific tree fruit establish an additional assessment on such specific tree fruit for special research projects of special interest to such specific tree fruit.

[ 1969 c 129 s 15.]